Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1418
Motor vehicle sale; violation; penalty.

Any person guilty of violating any of the provisions of section 60-1417 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1945, c. 143, § 10, p. 463;

R.R.S.1943, § 60-618;

Laws 1963, c. 365, § 14, p. 1179;

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 37;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 96.